Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1861
Real property taxes and special assessments; extinguishment after fifteen years; vitalization of constitutional amendment.

It is declared to be the intent and purpose of sections 77-203, and 77-1861 to 77-1863 to vitalize Article VIII, section 4, of the Constitution of Nebraska, and to invoke and exercise the powers conferred upon the Legislature of Nebraska, thereby.

Laws 1959, c. 354, § 1, p. 1249.